Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.080

Determination of public necessity and compliance with chapter.

Upon the hearing of the petition the county commissioners shall determine whether the public necessity or welfare of the proposed territory and of its inhabitants requires the formation of the district, and shall also determine whether the petition complies with the provisions of this chapter, and for that purpose shall hear all competent and relevant testimony offered.

[ 1957 c 153 s 8.]